District of Columbia statutes.
31-5326

Foreign or alien society; admission.

No foreign or alien society shall transact business in the District without a certificate of authority issued by the Commissioner in accordance with §§ 31-4501 and 31-4502 and § 31-2502.21.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1227, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1256.